Hawaii, session 2025, GM1110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that section 232-19,
Hawaii Revised Statutes, is no longer consistent with the appeal
procedures adopted by the judiciary and must be amended to
restore consistency.
The legislature further finds that Alford v. City and
County of Honolulu, 109 Hawai‘i 14, 122 P.3d 809 (2005), created
an issue regarding appellate jurisdiction over a dispositive
order that is later merged into a final judgment if a notice of
appeal is filed within thirty days of the judgment but not
within thirty days of the earlier order.
The purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Conform the statutory provisions for tax appeals with
the procedures adopted by the judiciary; and
(2) Clarify that an appeal may be taken if a notice of
appeal is filed within thirty days of the judgment or
within thirty days of the earlier order.
2025-1008 HB HMSO
iiiiniiiiiiii

Page 2 H.B. NO. 1115
SECTION 2. Section 232-19, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§232-19 Appeals; procedure. Any taxpayer or county
aggrieved or the assessor may appeal to the intermediate
S appellate court, subject to chapter 602, from the decision of
the tax appeal court by filing a written notice of appeal [with
the tax appea-Jr-court] and depositing [the-rew-i-th] the costs of
appeal, in the manner required by court rules, within thirty
days after the filing of the decision[—] or within thirty days
after entry of final judgment. The appeal shall be considered
and treated for all purposes as a general appeal and shall bring
up for determination all questions of fact and all questions of
law, including constitutional questions, involved in the appeal.
A notice of appeal may be amended at any time up to the final
determination of the tax liability by the last court from which
an appeal may be taken. The appellate court shall enter a
judgment in conformity with its opinion or decision.
All such appeals shall be speedily disposed of and, in the
hearing and disposition thereof, shall be given preference over
other litigation in the discretion of the court."
2025-1008 HB HMSO 2

Page 3 H.B. NO. UIS'
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.

INTRODUCED BY
JAN 2 1 2025
2025-1008 HB HMSO 3
iiiiiiiiiniiiiiiMii

1175
H.B. NO
APPROVED this 10th day of April ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HBNo. 1175
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: February 28, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: MAR 2 8 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
Senate of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session of 2025.
Ronald D. Kouchi
President of the Senate
Carol T. Taniguchi
Clerk of the Senate